District of Columbia statutes.
4-1341.08

Tax status.

The Trust Fund may engage in such activities that make it eligible for treatment as an organization described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) ) which may be exempt from federal taxation under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(a) ).

Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 9, 40 DCR 7222
1981 Ed., § 6-2138.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 4-1341.01.
Establishment of juvenile curfew: For temporary provisions establishing a curfew for juveniles under the age of 17 years in the District of Columbia, parental responsibility for implementation of the act, and exceptions to the act, see §§ 2 through 4 of the Juvenile Curfew Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-86, July 6, 1995, 42 DCR 3612).